HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
акторувати/AG
антикомутувати/A
бавити/ABCDGH
барвити/AB
бехнути/AB
блюзнити/A
бренькнути/A
будоражити/AB
буцнути/ABEF
вбавити/A
вволити/A
вгрівати/ABX
вербалізувати/ABGH
вибігти/A
вибути/A
вивіювати/AB
виглушити/A
вигранити/A
видобрити/AB
виживичувати/AB
визудити/A
виколисувати/A
викривити/ABEF
вилежувати/ABGH
вилускувати/A
виметикувати/A
вимуровувати/A
виорювати/AB
виплигувати/A
випостувати/A
випрягти/AB
вирости/A
виселити/ABEF
вислуховувати/AB
висталити/A
висукувати/AB
витовкмачувати/A
витрубити/A
вихитрувати/AB
вицілувати/AB
вишарувати/A
виштукатурювати/A
відбриніти/A
відволожити/AB
відгудіти/A
відзимувати/A
відкльовувати/A
відламувати/AB
відмахнути/ABEF
відокремлювати/AB
відпокутувати/A
відрекомендовувати/AB
відсікти/A
відстрашити/A
відтоптати/A
відцідити/A
відшуміти/A
вклеїти/AB
власкавити/A
вмостити/ABEF
воркотати/AG
впірнути/A
впрягти/AB
всиновити/AE
всунути/ABCD
втолкувати/AB
вурдити/AB
газувати/AB
гармоніювати/AG
гецнути/A
глушити/ABEFGH
гонорувати/A
граничити/A
грюкотати/A
гуцнути/A
дахувати/ABGH
декретувати/AB
дернувати/ABGH
дзенькотіти/A
дискувати/A
добалакувати/A
довірити/ABCD
доголити/ABEF
дозолити/A
докочувати/AB
долічити/AB
домощувати/A
допасувати/A
допомогти/A
доручити/AE
досмолити/A
дотекти/A
доціджувати/A
дременути/A
духопелити/A
елюювати/A
жвяхкотіти/AG
журити/ABGHF
забалотувати/A
заболіти/A
забудувати/A
заварити/ABEF
завідомити/A
зав'ючити/A
загиготати/A
загоїти/AB
загримкотіти/A
заґрунтовувати/AB
задзеленькотіти/A
задраповувати/A
зазеленити/A
заказувати/A
заклеїти/ABCD
законопачувати/AB
закреслити/ABEF
закусити/AE
заліпити/ABEF
замазувати/AB
замилувати/AB
заморочувати/AB
занепокоїти/AB
заохочувати/ABGH
запестити/A
заплішити/AB
заполоснути/A
запропоновувати/A
зарекомендувати/AB
зарябити/A
засичати/A
заслинювати/AB
засмуткувати/A
застерегти/A
застругувати/AB
затарити/AB
затнути/AB
затріщати/A
зауважити/AC
захолонути/A
зачепити/ABEF
зашморгувати/AB
збавити/ABCD
збовтувати/AB
звеліти/A
звучати/AG
згострити/A
здешевити/A
зжолобити/AB
зітнути/ABEF
злорічити/A
зметнути/ABEF
змостити/AB
знедолювати/A
знещасливити/A
зосереджувати/ABGH
зрощувати/AB
зчитувати/AB
інкорпорувати/ABGH
іскрити/ABEFGH
кантувати/AB
квилити/A
клинцювати/ABGH
колесити/AB
конвоювати/AB
копнути/ABEF
крамарювати/A
крутнути/ABEF
лавірувати/AB
лизнути/A
локалізувати/ABGH
мазонути/A
мастурбувати/AG
метнути/ABEF
млинкувати/A
мотижити/A
мчати/AB
навербовувати/AB
нав'язувати/ABGH
нагрубити/AE
надлетіти/A
надушити/ABEF
накип'ятити/A
накувати/A
наломлювати/AB
намозолювати/A
напартолити/A
напомадити/ABCD
наректи/AB
насікти/A
нататуювати/A
начерпувати/AB
недоорати/AB
ностальгувати/AG
обдаровувати/ABGH
облегшити/AB
обнулити/A
обслідувати/AB
обшалювати/AB
озвучувати/ABGH
опечатувати/AB
освітити/AB
отямити/A
парафінувати/A
перебудовувати/AB
перегорнути/ABEF
перезимувати/AB
перекутувати/A
перемчати/AB
переплести/AB
пересиджувати/AB
перетасувати/AB
перехолоджувати/AB
підважити/AC
підковувати/A
підмогоричити/A
підсвиснути/A
підтекти/A
пліткувати/AG
побушувати/A
повипитувати/A
повідшліфовувати/A
погнути/ABEF
подівувати/A
пожувати/A
позапаковувати/A
позвалювати/AB
покадити/A
покрикувати/AB
полущити/AB
пом'якшувати/ABOP
понамочувати/A
пообводити/A
попарити/ABCD
попересовувати/A
попідточувати/A
поприсолювати/A
порозвішувати/AB
посікти/AB
постежити/A
потрапити/AC
поціновувати/AB
поштурмувати/A
пригадувати/AB
прикінчити/A
примітити/AC
припрасовувати/A
пристикувати/AB
приурочувати/AB
пробриніти/A
прогоготати/A
прожарювати/A
прокурити/AB
пропарити/AB
просвітлювати/AB
простудити/ABEF
прохромити/A
п'янити/A
реорганізувати/ABGH
розбронювати/A
роздаровувати/AB
розколоти/AB
розміновувати/A
розпланувати/A
розсердити/ABCD
розтягувати/ABGHOP
розщеплювати/AB
секретарювати/AG
сквашувати/AB
скочити/AC
смалити/ABGH
спізнавати/A
спорснути/A
старшинувати/A
стригти/ABGH
сфантазувати/AB
телеграфувати/AB
торити/AG
тупотати/AG
угамувати/AB
уїздити/A
умащувати/A
уплинути/AC
усадовити/AB
утихомирювати/AB
ущемити/AB
хабарничати/A
хронометрувати/AB
чахнути/AE
шепелявити/AC
шумувати/AG
